Rhode Island, session 2025, SB678.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Title 44 of the General Laws entitled "TAXATION" is hereby amended by
adding thereto the following chapter:
CHAPTER 72
THE PARKING SERVICES TAXATION ACT
44-72-1. Definitions.
As used in this chapter:
(1) "Parking services" means the act of offering a parking space in or on a parking facility
for purposes of occupancy by a patron in exchange for a parking fee.
44-72-2. Local authority to implement parking services tax.
Each city and town in this state is authorized and empowered to pass ordinances requiring
all sales of parking services be taxed at a rate of no more than seven percent (7%). The tax shall be
in addition to any other taxes authorized by the general or public laws.
44-72-3. Exempt from maximum levy calculations.
Any revenue generated through parking services taxes authorized by this chapter shall not
be included in the calculation of a municipality's maximum levy increase controlled by § 44-5-2.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect on January 1, 2026.
========
LC001614
========